Hawaii statutes.
§88-57 Prior service generally. Prior
service is credited without cost to the member entitled thereto. Prior service
includes:

(1) Service as an employee rendered

(A) By an employee of the Territory prior to
January 1, 1926, or

(B) By an employee of any county prior to
January 1, 1928,

(2) Service in a similar capacity paid for by the
Republic of Hawaii or by the preceding provisional or monarchial governments,

(3) All service creditable to the employee under any
other retirement system supported wholly or in part by the State at the time
the employee became a member of this system,

(4) Periods of honorable service in the army, navy,
marine corps, coast guard and public health services of the United States at
any time between the dates of April 5, 1917, and July 2, 1920, which
service necessitated separation at the time of its inception from existing
Territorial or county employment,

(5) Service as an employee during the period from
January 1, 1926, to December 31, 1927, in the case of a member who
became an employee of the Territory during said period was in the regular
employ of any county immediately prior to the time the member became a
Territorial employee and was an employee of the Territory on January 1,
1928, and

(6) Other areas or periods of service described and
designated in this part to constitute prior service. [L 1925, c 55, pt of §4;
am L 1927, c 223, §2; am imp L 1927, c 251, §§1, 2; am imp L 1929, c 190, §1;
am imp L 1931, c 219, §§1, 2, 3; RL 1935, pt of §7923; am L 1935, c 48, §6; am
L 1937, c 235, §1; RL 1945, pt of §704; am L 1945, c 73, pt of §1(c); RL 1955,
§6-30; HRS §88-57; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next